Illinois, session 104th, HB1495.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-835 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-835 new)8    Sec. 2505-835. Property Tax Relief Pilot Program.9    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall 10establish and administer a property tax relief pilot program. 11Under the pilot program, eligible homeowners shall receive a 12one-time direct relief payment in an amount equal to a 13percentage, determined by the Department by rule, of the 14eligible homeowner's property tax liability for the 2025 tax 15year. Only one payment shall be made for each parcel of 16qualifying property. Payments under this Section shall be 17disbursed to eligible homeowners no later than December 31, 182026. The Department may provide by rule that any surplus 19moneys remaining in the Property Tax Relief Program Fund of 202026 shall be distributed to eligible homeowners who are 21members of low-income households. The Department, in 22consultation with the State Comptroller, shall adopt rules 23concerning the payment amount and the distribution of the   HB1495- 2 -LRB104 06533 HLH 16569 b1payments under this Section. 2    (b) In order to qualify for a payment under this Section: 3        (1) the qualifying property must be classified as 4    residential on January 1, 2025 and on January 1, 2026; 5        (2) the eligible homeowner must be liable for the 6    payment of property taxes on the qualifying property for 7    the 2025 taxable year; and 8        (3) the eligible homeowner must apply to the 9    Department for a payment under this Section no later than 10    August 31, 2026. 11    (c) The Department shall submit a report in connection 12with the program under this Section to the Governor and the 13General Assembly. The report shall be submitted no later than 14September 1, 2027. The report shall include a summary of the 15number of payments distributed under this Section, the total 16dollar amount of payments distributed under this Section by 17household market value, and any recommendations for future 18property tax relief. 19    (d) The Property Tax Relief Program Fund of 2026 is hereby 20created as a special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the 21Fund shall be used by the Department for the purpose of making 22payments under this Section. On July 1, 2026, or as soon 23thereafter as possible, the State Comptroller shall order 24transferred and the State Treasurer shall transfer from the 25General Revenue Fund to the Property Tax Relief Program Fund 26of 2026 the amount of $6,000,000,000.   HB1495- 3 -LRB104 06533 HLH 16569 b1    (e) As used in this Section: 2    "Department" means the Department of Revenue. 3    "Direct relief payment" means a payment made from the 4Property Tax Relief Program Fund of 2026 to an eligible 5homeowner under this Section. 6    "Eligible homeowner" means a person who (i) owns 7qualifying property in the State as of January 1, 2025 or (ii) 8as of January 1, 2025, has a leasehold interest in qualifying 9property in the State on which a single family residence is 10situated that is occupied as a residence by an eligible 11homeowner who has a legal or equitable interest in that 12property, as evidenced by a written instrument, as an owner or 13as a lessee, and on which the eligible homeowner is liable for 14the payment of property taxes. 15    "Homestead property" has the meaning given to that term in 16Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code. 17    "Qualifying property" means homestead property that, as of 18January 1, 2025, is occupied by an eligible homeowner as the 19eligible homeowner's principal dwelling place. 20    (f) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.  21    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 22Section 5.1030 as follows: 23    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)24    Sec. 5.1030. The Property Tax Relief Program Fund of 2026.